nb: Trykkinnstillinger: Justerbar/flere; Dobbel; Enkel; Annet
fi: Paineasetukset: Säädettävä/useita; Kaksiasentoinen; Yksiasentoinen; Muu
th: การตั้งค่าแรงดัน: ปรับได้/หลายระดับ; คู่; แบบเดี่ยว; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Postavke tlaka: Podesivo/višestruko; Dvostruka; Jednostruka; Ostalo
pt-BR: Configurações de pressão: Ajustável/múltiplo; Dual; Único; Outro
lt-LT: Slėgio nustatymai: Reguliuojamas/daugiafunkcis; Dvigubas; Vienas; Kita
bg-BG: Настройки на налягането: Регулируем/многократен; Двойно; Единично; Друго
es: Ajustes de presión: Ajustable/múltiple; Doble; Individual; Otros
sv: Tryckinställningar: Justerbar / flera; Dubbel; Enkel; Övrigt
da: Trykindstillinger: Justerbar/flere; Dobbelt; Enkelt; Andet
zh-TW: 壓力設定: 可調節/多段; 雙重; 單一; 其他
ro-RO: Setări de presiune: Reglabil/multiplu; Dublu; Simplu; Altele
vi: Các thiết lập áp suất: Có thể điều chỉnh/nhiều mức; Kép; Đơn; Khác
en: Pressure settings: Adjustable/multiple; Dual; Single; Other
fr: Réglages de pression: Réglable/multiple; Double; Unique; Autre
ja: 圧力設定: 調整可能/複数; デュアル; シングル; その他
pt-PT: Definições de pressão: Ajustável/múltiplo; Duplo; Único; Outro
cs: Nastavení tlaku: Nastavitelný tlak / několik stupňů; Dvě úrovně; Jedna úroveň; Jiné
pl: Ustawienia ciśnienia: Regulowane / wielostopniowe; Podwójne; Jednostopniowe; Inne
tr: Basınç ayarları: Ayarlanabilir/çoklu; Çift; Tek; Diğer
it: Impostazioni di pressione: Regolabile/multiplo; Doppie; Singolo; Altro
de: Druckeinstellungen: Verstellbar/mehrere Einstellungen; Zwei; Einzel; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Nastavenia tlaku: Nastaviteľné/viacúrovňové; Dvojité; Samostatné; Iné
ko: 압력 설정: 조절식/다단계; 듀얼; 싱글; 기타
zh-CN: 压力设置: 可调节/多档; 双档; 单档; 其他
el: Ρυθμίσεις πίεσης: Ρυθμιζόμενο/πολλαπλό; Διπλή; Μονή; Άλλο
ru: Режимы давления: Регулируемый/многофункциональный; Два режима; Один режим; Другое
sl-SI: Nastavitve tlaka: Nastavljivo/večkratno; Dvojno; Enojni; Druga
hu: Nyomásbeállítások: Állítható/többfokozatú; Kettős; Egyes; Egyéb
nl: Drukinstellingen: Verstelbaar/meerdere; Dubbel; Enkel; Overig